Arkansas, session 2025, HB1174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby
established for the Department of Corrections for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC003 SECRETARY OF CORRECTIONS 1 GRADE SE05
(2) N256N DOC CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE SE02
(3) U083U DOC CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE SE01
(4) D140C DOC CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE IT11
(5) D012C DATABASE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT08
(6) D094C DCC PROJ & ENTERPRISE PROGRAM MGMT ADMIN 1 GRADE IT08
*DJC005*
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
(7) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
(8) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 2 GRADE IT07
(9) D017C INFORMATION SYSTEMS SECURITY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT07
(10) D038C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 5 GRADE IT06
(11) D061C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATION SPEC 1 GRADE IT05
(12) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 12 GRADE IT05
(13) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 5 GRADE IT03
(14) D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 17 GRADE IT02
(15) N039N ADC DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(16) N048N ADC ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(17) N261N DOC MENTAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS14
(18) N130N DOC SHARED SERVICES CHIEF 2 GRADE GS14
(19) A108C ADC ASST CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS13
(20) G024N ADC GENERAL COUNSEL 2 GRADE GS13
(21) N258N DOC APPLIED RESEARCHER 1 GRADE GS13
(22) V043C DOC CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER 1 GRADE GS13
(23) G347C DOC CONTINUOUS IMPROVEMENT ADMIN 1 GRADE GS13
(24) G019C GENERAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS13
(25) P003N ADC PUBLIC INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE GS12
(26) A021C AGENCY CONTROLLER I 1 GRADE GS12
(27) G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS12
(28) G348C DOC CHIEF OF INVESTIGATIONS 1 GRADE GS12
(29) T129C DOC CHIEF TRAINING OFFICER 1 GRADE GS12
(30) G346C DOC POLICY ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(31) R006C HUMAN RESOURCES ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(32) A027C ACCOUNTING OPERATIONS MANAGER 2 GRADE GS11
(33) R013C AGENCY HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER 2 GRADE GS11
(34) C112C ADC POLICY & RESEARCH COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(35) T015C DOC DEPUTY WARDEN 1 GRADE GS10
(36) A050C AGENCY FISCAL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(37) G222C DOC INTERNAL AFFAIRS ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(38) T027C DOC TRAINING ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(39) G342C DOC VICTIM/WITNESS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(40) E022C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(41) A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(42) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
(43) R021C BUDGET ANALYST 1 GRADE GS08
(44) T065C DOC CORRECTIONAL SERGEANT 2 GRADE GS08
(45) T104C DOC TRAINING ACADEMY SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS08
(46) A066C INTERNAL AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS08
(47) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 3 GRADE GS08
(48) V007C PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(49) X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(50) A089C ACCOUNTANT I 2 GRADE GS07
(51) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(52) A081C AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS07
(53) T075C DOC CORPORAL 1 GRADE GS07
(54) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(55) X053C INTERNAL AFFAIRS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(56) P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(57) A063C RESEARCH & STATISTICS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(58) S011C ADC COMMODITY & FOOD SVC ADMR 1 GRADE GS06
(59) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 4 GRADE GS06
(60) X133C DOC INTERNAL AFFAIRS INVESTIGATOR 6 GRADE GS06
(61) R030C EEO/GRIEVANCE OFFICER 1 GRADE GS06
(62) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 6 GRADE GS06
(63) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(64) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 3 GRADE GS06
(65) T103C LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING INSTRUCTOR 11 GRADE GS06
(66) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(67) M048C SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM LEADER 1 GRADE GS06
(68) R033C BENEFITS ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(69) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(70) V014C BUYER 5 GRADE GS05
(71) V013C CENTRAL WAREHOUSE OPERATIONS MGR 1 GRADE GS05
(72) M058C DOC PROGRAM SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(73) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 9 GRADE GS05
(74) R032C HUMAN RESOURCES PROGRAM REPRESENTATIVE 5 GRADE GS05
(75) R031C INSTITUTION HUMAN RESOURCES COORD 2 GRADE GS05
(76) V015C PURCHASING SPECIALIST 6 GRADE GS05
(77) E051C STAFF DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS05
(78) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 9 GRADE GS04
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
(79) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 22 GRADE GS04
(80) R038C HUMAN RESOURCES ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS04
(81) R036C HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(82) V020C INVENTORY CONTROL MANAGER 2 GRADE GS04
(83) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(84) V022C PURCHASING TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE GS04
(85) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 4 GRADE GS03
(86) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 1 GRADE GS02
(87) V030C SHIPPING & RECEIVING CLERK 1 GRADE GS02
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 214

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - SHARED SERVICES PAYING ACCOUNT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the
paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Corrections -
Shared Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $11,662,894
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 4,404,211
(03) OVERTIME 100,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 15,858,565
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 210,408
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 250,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) MEDICAL CONTRACTS 141,429,822
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $173,915,900

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - COUNTY JAIL REIMBURSEMENT. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the County
Jail Reimbursement Fund, for reimbursement to counties housing state inmates
of the Department of Corrections - County Jail Reimbursement for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS $34,800,000

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Corrections - Division of Correction for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U035U ADC DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE04
(2) U062U ADC CHIEF DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(3) L001C PSYCHOLOGIST SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE MP04
(4) L097C ADC PSYCHOLOGIST 11 GRADE MP03
(5) L003C PSYCHOLOGIST 1 GRADE MP03
(6) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 1 GRADE MP01
(7) N039N ADC DEPUTY DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS15
(8) N048N ADC ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(9) G014N ADC COMPLIANCE ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS13
(10) T001N ADC SUPERINTENDENT 7 GRADE GS13
(11) N120N ADC FARM ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(12) N136N ADC HEALTH SERVICE ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(13) N119N ADC INDUSTRY ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(14) T005C DOC CORRECTIONAL WARDEN 10 GRADE GS12
(15) T109C SEX OFFENDER COMM NOTIFCTN ASMNT ADMIN 1 GRADE GS12
(16) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS11
(17) S108C DOC CONSTRUCTION DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(18) T033C DOC MAJOR 25 GRADE GS11
(19) T048C DOC CAPTAIN 55 GRADE GS10
(20) T015C DOC DEPUTY WARDEN 25 GRADE GS10
(21) T006C ADC HEAD FARM MANAGER II 3 GRADE GS09
(22) T054C DOC LIEUTENANT 159 GRADE GS09
(23) E022C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION MANAGER 2 GRADE GS09
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
(24) B042C ENGINEER 1 GRADE GS09
(25) A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(26) M009C LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER 25 GRADE GS09
(27) L033C PSYCHOLOGICAL EXAMINER 4 GRADE GS09
(28) L041C ADC ASST MEDICAL PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(29) S094C ADC CONSTRUCTION/MAINTENANCE COORD 4 GRADE GS08
(30) T021C ADC HEAD FARM MANAGER I 3 GRADE GS08
(31) S010C ADC INDUSTRY PROGRAM MANAGER 7 GRADE GS08
(32) M031C ADMINISTRATOR OF CHAPLAINCY SVCS 1 GRADE GS08
(33) T065C DOC CORRECTIONAL SERGEANT 885 GRADE GS08
(34) A066C INTERNAL AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS08
(35) M088C LICENSED MASTER SOCIAL WORKER 7 GRADE GS08
(36) M020C LICENSED PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR 66 GRADE GS08
(37) V007C PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS08
(38) G121C REHAB PROGRAM MANAGER 9 GRADE GS08
(39) A060C SENIOR AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS08
(40) G142C ADC CLASSIFICATION ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(41) S096C ADC CONSTRUCTION PROJECT SUPERVISOR 15 GRADE GS07
(42) G159C DEPARTMENT BUSINESS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(43) S019C DIRECTOR MAINTENANCE 10 GRADE GS07
(44) T075C DOC CORPORAL 2,316 GRADE GS07
(45) T059C DOC FOOD PREPARATION MANAGER 20 GRADE GS07
(46) G322C DOC INMATE GRIEVANCE COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(47) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS07
(48) M026C LICENSED SOCIAL WORKER 1 GRADE GS07
(49) L052C REHAB FACILITY SUPERVISOR 6 GRADE GS07
(50) M049C SENIOR CHAPLAIN 7 GRADE GS07
(51) E041C SENIOR LIBRARIAN 1 GRADE GS07
(52) M023C SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM COORD 4 GRADE GS07
(53) B040C ADC AGRICULTURE PRODUCTION SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(54) T040C ADC ASSISTANT HEAD FARM MANAGER 4 GRADE GS06
(55) S095C ADC CONSTRUCTION PROJECT SPECIALIST 9 GRADE GS06
(56) S027C ADC INDUSTRIAL SUPERVISOR II 19 GRADE GS06
(57) S105C ADC INDUSTRY PROGRAM SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(58) T039C ADC INMATE TRANSPORTATION COORD 1 GRADE GS06
(59) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 13 GRADE GS06
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
(60) T053C AGRICULTURE UNIT SUPERVISOR II 31 GRADE GS06
(61) M044C ASSOCIATE PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR 14 GRADE GS06
(62) M057C CHAPLAIN 18 GRADE GS06
(63) L058C DISEASE INTERVENTION SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(64) X133C DOC INTERNAL AFFAIRS INVESTIGATOR 2 GRADE GS06
(65) G340C DOC ASST INMATE GRIEVANCE COORDINATOR 6 GRADE GS06
(66) T070C DOC FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR 86 GRADE GS06
(67) C026C RECORDS/INTAKE SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS06
(68) T061C SENIOR IA 1 GRADE GS06
(69) S016C SKILLED TRADES FOREMAN 1 GRADE GS06
(70) S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(71) M048C SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM LEADER 45 GRADE GS06
(72) T041C WORK RELEASE PROGRAM SUPERVISOR 4 GRADE GS06
(73) G216C ADC INMATE GRIEVANCE COORDINATOR 19 GRADE GS05
(74) P044C ADC SALES REPRESENTATIVE 4 GRADE GS05
(75) T071C ADC UNIT TRAINING SUPERVISOR 17 GRADE GS05
(76) T058C AGRICULTURE UNIT SUPERVISOR I 3 GRADE GS05
(77) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 17 GRADE GS05
(78) G215C CAREER PLANNING & PLACEMENT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS05
(79) G200C CLASSIFICATION & ASSIGNMENT OFFICER 20 GRADE GS05
(80) X128C CORRECTIONAL UNIT ACCREDITATION SPEC 12 GRADE GS05
(81) X127C DISCIPLINARY HEARING OFFICER 5 GRADE GS05
(82) T076C DOC ADMIN REVIEW OFFICER 6 GRADE GS05
(83) M059C DOC ADVISOR 14 GRADE GS05
(84) S026C DOC ASST MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 13 GRADE GS05
(85) M058C DOC PROGRAM SPECIALIST 14 GRADE GS05
(86) C024C DOC RECORDS SUPERVISOR 23 GRADE GS05
(87) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS05
(88) R031C INSTITUTION HUMAN RESOURCES COORDINATOR 15 GRADE GS05
(89) V015C PURCHASING SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS05
(90) M065C RECREATIONAL ACTIVITY SUPERVISOR 20 GRADE GS05
(91) S043C ADC INDUSTRIAL SUPERVISOR I 7 GRADE GS04
(92) T077C ADC MAILROOM SERVICES COORDINATOR 15 GRADE GS04
(93) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 35 GRADE GS04
(94) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 13 GRADE GS04
(95) R038C HUMAN RESOURCES ASSISTANT 22 GRADE GS04
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
(96) R036C HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(97) S051C INSTRUMENTATION TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS04
(98) V020C INVENTORY CONTROL MANAGER 2 GRADE GS04
(99) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(100) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 24 GRADE GS04
(101) V024C ADC PROPERTY OFFICER 2 GRADE GS03
(102) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 65 GRADE GS03
(103) T081C COMMISSARY MANAGER 29 GRADE GS03
(104) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 102 GRADE GS02
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 4,509

SECTION 5. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Corrections - Division of Correction for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one
hundred seventy (170) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates
of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - INMATE CARE & CUSTODY. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the
Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Corrections - Division
of Correction - Inmate Care & Custody for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $192,640,115
(02) EXTRA HELP 100,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 82,977,040
(04) OVERTIME 15,050,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 69,737,850
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 155,398
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
(C) PROF. FEES 655,724
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 749,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) JAIL CONTRACTS 1,533,000
(07) ENERGY SAVINGS & EFFICIENCIES 1,431,465
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $365,029,592

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - INMATE WELFARE PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Corrections - Division of Correction - Inmate Welfare Program
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $985,130
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 465,289
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 17,028,560
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 4,250,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $22,728,979

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - WORK RELEASE PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses and debt service of the
Department of Corrections - Division of Correction - Work Release Program for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $5,394,120
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 104,150
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 2,427,590
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) DEBT SERVICE 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $8,025,860

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - PRISON INDUSTRY PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the
Division of Correction Prison Industry Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Corrections - Division of Correction
- Prison Industry Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,351,787
(02) EXTRA HELP 10,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,091,660
(04) OVERTIME 8,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 7,905,213
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 41,280
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 850,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $12,357,940

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - FARM OPERATIONS PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the
Division of Correction Farm Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Corrections - Division of Correction - Farm
Operations Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,871,466
(02) EXTRA HELP 10,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,307,018
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 12,900,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 53,010
(C) PROF. FEES 138,354
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 2,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) PURCHASE CATTLE/MEAT 650,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $19,929,848

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - NON-TAX REVENUE RECEIPTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Corrections
- Division of Correction - Non-Tax Revenue Receipts for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $1,841,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 30,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) CONSTRUCTION 1,870,200
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,741,200

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - ADC SEX OFFENDER ASSESSMENT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the
Sex and Child Offenders Registration Fund, for operating expenses of the
Department of Corrections - Division of Correction - ADC Sex Offender
Assessment for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $50,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 120,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $170,000

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - FIRE STATION - PROTECTION. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Corrections
- Division of Correction - Fire Station - Protection for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $25,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $25,000

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - PAWS IN PRISON. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the cash
fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Corrections
- Division of Correction - Paws In Prison for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PAWS IN PRISON $150,000

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - MEDICAL MONETARY SANCTIONS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Corrections, to be payable from the
cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for comprehensive inmate/offender health services of
the Department of Corrections - Division of Correction - Medical Monetary
Sanctions for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MEDICAL MONETARY SANCTIONS $5,000,000

SECTION 16. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
OF APPROPRIATION WITHIN CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS. The Department of
Corrections is hereby authorized to transfer appropriation between and/or
among the various capital improvements/construction projects authorized by
the General Assembly. Such transfers may be made only after approval by the
Governor and after prior approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee. Such authorization shall in no way mean that the
total amount of funds or appropriations for capital improvement/construction
projects be greater than that provided by the General Assembly for the
Department of Corrections.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Department of Corrections - Division of Correction
may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the
Department of Corrections authorizing broad powers under this Section.
Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly
maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a
severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 17. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
REALLOCATION OF RESOURCES. Upon determination by the Board of Corrections,
at the request of the Secretary of Corrections, that a reallocation of
resources within the Division of Community Correction and Division of
Correction is necessary for the efficient and effective operation of the
divisions department, the Board, with approval of the Governor and approval
by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, shall have the
authority to instruct the division directors Department Secretary, to request
from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, a transfer of positions,
programs, funds, appropriations, and line-item appropriations within or
between existing and newly created divisions, offices, sections, or units of
the divisions department. If it is determined that the requested transfer
should be made, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall then initiate the
necessary transfer documents to reflect the transfers upon the fiscal records
of the State Treasurer, the State Auditor, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, and the Department of Corrections Divisions of Correction and
Community Correction. Provided, however, that the Board Department Secretary
shall be limited to submitting no more than two requests, encompassing a
single purpose listed in this section, during any fiscal year per division.
Transfer authority shall further be limited to no more than five percent (5%)
of the total General Revenue and Special Revenue appropriation, funding, and
positions specific to each agency division, office, section, or unit from
which funds are transferred. However, there shall be no fund transfers to or
from the County Jail Reimbursement Fund. A Reallocation of Resources
Transfer shall be limited to the following specific purposes:
a) Costs to open and operate temporary beds;
b) Payment of Debt Service;
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
c) Payment of Overtime Expenses;
d) Unanticipated increases for medical or private prison contracts;
e) Construction/renovation/equipping of new beds;
f) Deficits in Farm or Industry Program;
g) Losses not covered by insurance proceeds;
h) Costs of personnel for critical services necessary to carry out the
mission of the agency.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Department of Corrections Divisions of Correction and
the Division of Community Correction may operate more efficiently if some
flexibility is provided to the Board of Corrections authorizing broad powers
under the Reallocation of Resources provisions herein. Therefore, it is both
necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by
requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section.
If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court jurisdiction, this entire
section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 18. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. HOLIDAY
COMPENSATION. The Department of Corrections is authorized to pay employees
for hours of unused holidays in the employee's holiday account. Payments of
unused Holiday hours must be processed on or before June 1st in each fiscal
year. Employees terminating employment from the Department of Corrections
will be eligible for all holiday pay accrued. This request is contingent on
approval by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State after the Secretary of the
Department of Corrections has verified that sufficient revenues are available
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
to make such payments to employees who have served in the following
classifications, with the exception that those employees wishing to accrue
banked hours be allowed the option to bank unused holiday hours in the
employee's holiday account, not to exceed one-hundred fifty (150) hours:

Class
Code Title Grade
T033C ADC/DCC MAJOR GRADE GS09
T048C ADC/DCC CAPTAIN GRADE GS08
T054C ADC/DCC LIEUTENANT GRADE GS07
T059C ADC/DCC FOOD PREPARATION MANAGER GRADE GS07
TO65C ADC/DCC CORRECTIONAL SERGEANT GRADE GS06
T070C ADC/DCC FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR GRADE GS06
T075C ADC/DCC CORPORAL GRADE GS05
T083C ADC/DCC CORRECTIONAL OFFICER I GRADE GS04
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 19. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION REPORT. The Department of Finance and Administration Office of
Budget shall prepare and submit to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee a report reflecting the amount of appropriation and funding
necessary for the Department of Corrections to sufficiently budget for the
expenditure of payments to employees for all Holiday Liability, GAP Time
Liability, Overtime, and Hazardous Duty Compensation incurred, including the
current balances of said liabilities. This report shall be included in the
summary budget information manual submitted during the biennial budget
process.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 20. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. COUNTY
JAIL REIMBURSEMENT FUND YEAR-END FUND BALANCE CARRY FORWARD. Notwithstanding
any law pertaining to the transfer of year-end fund balances or any law to
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
the contrary, any funds which remain in the County Jail Reimbursement Fund at
the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the County Jail Reimbursement Fund
and made available to fund appropriations authorized by law payable from the
County Jail Reimbursement Fund for the following fiscal year.
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized herein, may
be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2024 2025 the Agency shall by written statement set
forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward from
the first fiscal year to the second fiscal year by the September Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting which report shall
include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution and the
amount of the funding carried forward from the first fiscal year to the
second fiscal year, the program name or line item, the funding source of that
appropriation and a copy of the written request set forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include
all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals and/or a
statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 21. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. REFUND TO
EXPENDITURE. The proceeds from the sale of feeder cattle by the Department
of Corrections - Division of Correction shall be deposited into the State
Treasury as a refund to expenditure to the credit of the appropriation
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
available to the Department of Corrections - Division of Correction for the
"Purchase Cattle/Meat" line item.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 22. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. USE OF
MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION APPROPRIATION AND SALVAGED MATERIALS CONSTRUCTION.
The Department of Corrections - Division of Correction is hereby authorized
to utilize Maintenance and General Operation Appropriation in conjunction
with surplus and/or salvageable materials for the purpose of implementing
construction projects to benefit the Department and its various programs.
Before such projects may be undertaken, a Method of Finance must be submitted
for prior review and approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee, and review and approval by the Department of Finance and
Administration and the Building Authority Division of the Department of
Finance and Administration.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Department of Corrections - Division of Correction
may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the
Department of Corrections authorizing broad powers under this Section.
Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly
maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a
severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
SECTION 23. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SPECIAL
REVENUE/CASH FUNDS TRANSFER. The Department of Corrections is authorized to
transfer funds from various Special Revenue and Cash Funds into the Inmate
Care and Custody Fund Account in order to adjust to the budget needs upon
prior approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
and approval of the Board of Corrections and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Department of Corrections may operate more
efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Corrections
authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary
and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring
prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as
provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section.
If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction,
this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 24. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. NEW
FACILITIES. If it is found that contracting for the operation of new
facilities is economically beneficial to the State of Arkansas, the
Department of Corrections may, after receiving approval of the Chief Fiscal
Officer, and seeking prior review and approval by the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee, transfer from any line item appropriation
contained in the Inmate Care & Custody appropriation of this Act into the
Professional Fees and Services line item contained in the Inmate Care &
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
Custody appropriation of this Act to operate new facilities.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Department of Corrections may operate more
efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Corrections
authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary
and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring
prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as
provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section.
If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction,
this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 25. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
APPROPRIATION TRANSFER FOR CONSTRUCTING AND EQUIPPING. The Department of
Corrections is hereby authorized to transfer appropriations between any line
items authorized herein but only for the purpose of financing construction or
equipment for a facility of the department. Any transfers authorized by this
section shall require the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
after prior review and approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Department of Corrections may operate more
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Corrections
authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary
and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring
prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as
provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section.
If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction,
this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 26. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
OF APPROPRIATION AND FUNDS TO THE COUNTY JAIL REIMBURSEMENT FUND. If any
savings of general revenue appropriation and funds accrue during the 2024-
2025 2025-2026 fiscal year in the operations of the Department of Corrections
- Division of Correction & Community Correction, the Secretary of the
Department of Corrections may request a transfer of appropriation and funds
from any line item appropriation to the County Jail Reimbursement Fund in
order to meet obligations to counties for housing state inmates. Such
transfer request shall be made upon the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State and prior review and approval by the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 27. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
OF FUNDS. The Arkansas Department of Corrections shall provide funding each
year in an amount not to exceed $100,000 for a Deputy Prosecuting Attorney
who will be assigned to handle the prosecution of offenses occurring at the
Arkansas Department of Corrections. Upon request by the Auditor of the State,
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer an amount not to exceed
$100,000 from an account designated by the Secretary of the Department of
Corrections to the State Central Services Fund as a direct revenue to fund a
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
Deputy Prosecuting Attorney who will be assigned to handle the prosecution of
offenses occurring at the Arkansas Department of Corrections.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 28. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SHARED
SERVICES. (a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create a Shared
Services paying account on his or her books and on the books of the Treasurer
of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal services and
operating expenses in the Shared Services Paying Account Appropriation by the
Department of Corrections.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer
of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account
appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(3) The transfer authority provided to the department in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section may be used to make transfers only within
the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts
authorized for the department.
(4) The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the
date of passage through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 29. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CARRY
FORWARD - GENERAL REVENUE YEAR END FUND BALANCE. (a) The Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall cause to be transferred on his or her books and
those of the State Treasurer and Auditor of State the balance of General
Revenue funds remaining in the Division of Correction Fund Account on June
30, 2026 into a sub-fund created within the Division of Correction Fund
Account to be used for County Jail Reimbursement or maintenance needs within
the Department of Corrections - Division of Correction. The balance of
General Revenue in the sub-fund of the Division of Correction Fund Account at
the beginning of any fiscal year shall not exceed five million dollars
($5,000,000). For this reason, any general revenue which would cause the
balance of sub-fund of the Division of Correction Fund Account to exceed five
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be reclaimed by the Department of Finance
and Administration pursuant to the same procedures as other general revenue
recapture.
(b) Any carry forward of the unexpended balance of funding as authorized
herein, may be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) The Office of Budget of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall report to the Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September meeting of the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee
meeting which report shall include the name of the agency, board, commission,
or institution and the amount of funding carried forward, the program name or
line item and the funding source; and
(2) The Department of Corrections - Division of Correction shall provide a
written report to the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in subdivision (b)(1) of this section no
later than thirty (30) days prior to the time the Department presents its
budget request to the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, or both;
and
(3) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include all
information obtained in subdivision (b)(2) of this section in the budget
manuals.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2025 through June 30, 2026.

SECTION 30. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 31. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1174
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 32. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee

















03-12-2025 15:42:28 DJC005